Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB380.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286 IS ESTABLISHED,
AND A NEW SECTION THEREOF IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in this subtitle, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Affiliate" means a person that, either directly or indirectly through one (1) or
more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with
another person;
(2) "Agent":
(a) Means a person authorized by written agreement and designated by a
virtual currency kiosk operator to engage in virtual currency kiosk business
in this state on behalf of the operator;
(b) Includes, as the context requires, a person that an applicant proposes to
engage in virtual currency kiosk business in this state as an agent on behalf
of the applicant; and
(c) Does not include an employee of a virtual currency kiosk operator or
applicant;
(3) "Control" means one (1) or more of the following:
(a) The power to direct the management, operations, or policies of a person,
which power may be:
1. Direct or indirect; and
2. Obtained:
a. Through legal or beneficial ownership of voting power in the
person; or
b. Under a contract, arrangement, or understanding;
(b) The power to vote, directly or indirectly, at least twenty-five percent (25%) of
the outstanding voting shares or voting interests of a person or a person in
Page 1 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
control of the person;
(c) The power to elect or appoint a majority of a person's executive officers,
managers, directors, trustees, or other persons exercising managerial
authority of a person or a person in control of the person;
(d) The power to exercise, directly or indirectly, a controlling influence over the
management or policies of a person or a person in control of the person;
and
(e) Any other set of facts or circumstances, as determined by the commissioner
through promulgation of an administrative regulation in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A, that constitutes control;
(4) "Director" means any of the following:
(a) A member of a corporation's board of directors;
(b) A manager of a limited liability company;
(c) A partner of a partnership; or
(d) A member of any other entity's governing body;
(5) "Executive officer" means:
(a) A president, chairperson of the executive committee, responsible individual,
or chief financial officer; or
(b) Any other natural person who performs similar functions for an applicant,
licensee, or agent;
(6) "Fiat currency" means a government-issued currency that is:
(a) Backed by the government's authority; and
(b) Not backed by a physical commodity;
(7) "Key shareholder" means any person, or group of persons acting in concert, that
is the owner of twenty percent (20%) or more of any voting class of the stock of
an applicant, licensee, or agent;
(8) "Legal tender":
Page 2 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
(a) Means a medium of exchange or unit of value, including the coin or paper
money of the United States, that is:
1. Issued by:
a. The United States; or
b. Another government; or
2. Recognized by the Commonwealth of Kentucky, as permitted under
Article 1, Section 10, of the Constitution of the United States; and
(b) Does not include any medium of exchange or unit of value authorized,
recognized, or adopted by a foreign government if the medium of exchange
or unit of value was a virtual currency before the government authorized,
recognized, or adopted the medium of exchange or unit of value;
(9) "License" means a license issued by the commissioner under this subtitle;
(10) "Licensee" means a person issued a license;
(11) "Material litigation":
(a) Means litigation that according to generally accepted accounting principles:
1. Is significant to the financial health of an applicant, licensee, or
agent; and
2. Would be required to be disclosed in the applicant's, licensee's, or
agent's annual audited financial statements, report to shareholders, or
similar records; and
(b) Includes any adjudication against an applicant, licensee, or agent by a
federal or state administrative or regulatory agency relating to a violation of
the Bank Secrecy Act, 31 U.S.C. secs. 5311 to 5332 and 31 C.F.R. pt. 103,
regardless of whether liability or fault has been admitted;
(12) "Responsible individual":
(a) Means a natural person who:
1. Is employed by a virtual currency kiosk operator; and
Page 3 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
2. Has principal managerial authority over the virtual currency kiosk
operator's virtual currency kiosk business in this state; and
(b) Includes, as the context requires, a natural person who:
1. Is employed by an applicant; and
2. The applicant proposes to have principal managerial authority over its
virtual currency kiosk business in this state;
(13) "Virtual currency":
(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, means a digital
representation of value that is:
1. Used as a:
a. Medium of exchange;
b. Unit of account; or
c. Store of value; and
2. Not legal tender, whether or not denominated in legal tender; and
(b) Does not include:
1. A transaction in which a merchant grants, as part of an affinity or
rewards program, value that cannot be taken from or exchanged with
a merchant for legal tender, bank credit, or virtual currency; or
2. A digital representation of value:
a. Issued by or on behalf of a publisher; and
b. Used solely within an online game, game platform, or family of
games:
i. Sold by the same publisher; or
ii. Offered on the same game platform;
(14) (a) "Virtual currency kiosk" means a physical electronic terminal acting as a
mechanical agent of a virtual currency kiosk operator to enable the
operator to facilitate the exchange of one (1) or more of the following:
Page 4 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
1. Fiat currency for virtual currency;
2. Virtual currency for fiat currency; and
3. Virtual currency for other virtual currency.
(b) As used in this subsection, "facilitate" includes:
1. Connecting directly to a separate virtual currency exchanger that
performs the exchange; and
2. Drawing upon the virtual currency or fiat currency in the possession
or control of the virtual currency kiosk operator to perform the
exchange;
(15) "Virtual currency kiosk charges" means all of the following:
(a) Fees and expenses charged to a virtual currency kiosk user; and
(b) The difference between the market price of virtual currency and the price of
the virtual currency charged to a virtual currency kiosk user;
(16) "Virtual currency kiosk operator" or "operator" means a person, including a
licensee, that engages in virtual currency kiosk business in this state;
(17) "Virtual currency kiosk transaction" means any transaction:
(a) Conducted or performed by electronic means via a virtual currency kiosk
located in this state; or
(b) Made at a virtual currency kiosk located in this state to purchase, sell,
transfer, or otherwise exchange virtual currency; and
(18) "Virtual currency kiosk user" or "user" means a person, other than a virtual
currency kiosk operator, that initiates, authorizes, completes, or engages in a
virtual currency kiosk transaction.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
This subtitle shall not apply to:
(1) The United States or any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof;
Page 5 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
(2) A state or any agency, department, or political subdivision of a state;
(3) A state-chartered or federally chartered bank, savings bank, savings and loan
association, trust company, or credit union;
(4) A bank holding company, as defined in 12 U.S.C. sec. 1841, as amended;
(5) A subsidiary, affiliate, or service corporation of a person referenced in subsection
(3) or (4) of this section;
(6) An office of an international banking corporation;
(7) A branch of a foreign bank;
(8) A bank service company, as defined in 12 U.S.C. sec. 1861, as amended;
(9) A corporation organized under the Edge Act, 12 U.S.C. sec. 611, et seq., as
amended; or
(10) A service provider that:
(a) Pursuant to a written agreement, acts on behalf of an entity referenced in
subsection (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), or (9) of this section; and
(b) Allows the state or federal regulators with regulatory jurisdiction over the
entity on whose behalf the service provider is acting to examine and inspect
the service provider's applicable records, books, and transactions.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) The commissioner:
1. Shall enforce the provisions of this subtitle; and
2. Subject to paragraph (b) of this subsection, may promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A that
the commissioner determines are necessary to effectuate, or aid in the
effectuation of, this subtitle.
(b) The discretion to promulgate administrative regulations under paragraph
(a)2. of this subsection shall be supplemental to any other provisions of this
Page 6 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
subtitle relating to the promulgation of administrative regulations.
(2) (a) The commissioner may, by order, require licensees to file with the
commissioner any:
1. Special report that the commissioner determines is necessary for the
proper supervision of virtual currency kiosk business under this
subtitle; and
2. Regular report that is:
a. Developed as a uniform report by state regulators; and
b. Submitted in accordance with Section 5 of this Act.
(b) All reports filed under this subtitle shall contain a certification by an
executive officer or director of the licensee that attests to the truth and
correctness of the report.
(3) The commissioner may invoke the aid of the courts through injunction or other
proper process to:
(a) Enjoin any existing or threatened violation of this subtitle; or
(b) Enforce any proper order or action issued or taken by the commissioner.
(4) (a) The remedies and penalties set forth in this subtitle shall be cumulative.
(b) This subtitle shall not be construed to limit or restrict the powers, duties,
remedies, or penalties available to the commissioner or any other person
under any other statutory or common law.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) A person shall not engage in virtual currency kiosk business in this state
without:
1. A license; and
2. First obtaining, for each:
a. Agent, the written approval of the commissioner to designate the
Page 7 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
agent to engage in virtual currency kiosk business in this state
on behalf of the person; and
b. Location at which the person, or an agent of the person, engages
in virtual currency kiosk business in this state:
i. Any license, permit, registration, or other authorization
required for the person, agent, or location under any
applicable local ordinance, resolution, or regulation; and
ii. The written approval of the commissioner to do business at
the location, as provided in Section 8 of this Act.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, a person shall be
deemed to be engaged in virtual currency kiosk business in this state if the
person:
1. Owns, operates, solicits, markets, or advertises a virtual currency kiosk
located in this state; or
2. Engages in, or holds out as being able to engage in, a virtual currency
kiosk transaction with or on behalf of any virtual currency kiosk user.
(c) A person shall not be deemed to be engaged in virtual currency kiosk
business in this state solely because the person leases space to, or otherwise
contracts for or allows, a virtual currency kiosk operator to locate a virtual
currency kiosk at a store or locale in this state.
(2) A license shall:
(a) Be valid unless it is:
1. Revoked or suspended by the commissioner;
2. Surrendered by the licensee; or
3. Expired;
(b) Except as provided in Section 12 of this Act, not be transferred or assigned;
and
Page 8 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
(c) Expire on December 31 of the year in which it is issued, unless renewed or
reinstated in accordance with Section 11 of this Act.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "registry" means the State Regulatory Registry, LLC, or
its successor organization.
(2) When an application, report, or approval request is required to be filed with the
commissioner under this subtitle, the commissioner may require that the filing,
including any applicable fees and supporting documentation, be submitted to:
(a) The registry or its successor organization;
(b) The registry's parent, affiliate, or operating subsidiary; or
(c) Other agencies or authorities as part of a nationwide licensing system;
which may act as an agent for receiving, requesting, and distributing information
to and from any source directed by the commissioner.
(3) The commissioner:
(a) May report violations of this subtitle, enforcement actions, and other
relevant information that the commissioner deems necessary to carry out
the purpose of this section to the registry or its affiliated entities; and
(b) Shall establish a process whereby licensees may challenge information
entered into the registry by the commissioner.
(4) The commissioner shall annually request:
(a) Audited financial reports, including inquiring as to the budget and fees
collected, both proposed and actual, from the registry; and
(b) Any nonconfidential protocols or reports for the security and safeguarding
of personal information maintained by the registry, including inquiring as
to:
1. Whether the system has implemented and complied with the data
Page 9 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
security guidelines set forth in the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, 15 U.S.C.
sec. 6801;
2. The results of any nonconfidential periodic data protection audits that
the system may conduct; and
3. Whether any security breaches have occurred resulting in the
substantial likelihood that personal information may be misused or
stolen.
(5) The commissioner may establish relationships and contracts with other
governmental agencies or entities affiliated with the registry that the
commissioner deems necessary to carry out this section.
(6) For purposes of this section, the commissioner may use other governmental
agencies or the registry or its affiliated entities as an agent for requesting
information from, and distributing information to, the United States Department
of Justice or other governmental agencies.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) A person seeking to become a licensee shall file a complete application for a
license with the commissioner.
(b) An application for a license shall not be complete unless it:
1. Is made in writing, under oath or affirmation;
2. Is in the format required by the commissioner;
3. Contains, and is accompanied by, the information, documentation,
and evidence required under Section 7 of this Act;
4. Contains an attestation that the applicant is in, and will maintain,
compliance with Section 10 of this Act;
5. Is accompanied by evidence that the requirements of Section 9 of this
Act have been satisfied; and
Page 10 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
6. Is accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee that is determined
by the commissioner in accordance with Section 13 of this Act.
(2) Within ninety (90) days after receipt of a complete application for a license,
which period may be extended by the commissioner for good cause, the
commissioner shall:
(a) Review the application and all attachments for compliance with the
requirements of this subtitle;
(b) Investigate the following of the applicant, including for each person in
control of the applicant and each responsible individual:
1. Competence;
2. Experience;
3. Character;
4. Financial condition; and
5. Responsibility; and
(c) Subject to Section 24 of this Act and subsection (4) of this section, issue:
1. An unconditional license to the applicant to engage in virtual
currency kiosk business at one (1) or more locations in this state;
2. A notice of intent to issue a conditional license to the applicant to
engage in virtual currency kiosk business at one (1) or more locations
in this state; or
3. A notice of intent to deny the applicant's application for a license.
(3) As part of the review and investigation of an application under subsection (2) of
this section, the commissioner may, in his or her discretion, investigate an
applicant's business premises.
(4) (a) The commissioner shall issue an unconditional license to an applicant to
engage in virtual currency kiosk business at one (1) or more locations in
this state if the commissioner determines that the applicant:
Page 11 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
1. Is in compliance with the requirements of this subtitle;
2. Has reasonably demonstrated that it has the competence, experience,
character, financial condition, and responsibility to continue to satisfy
the requirements of this subtitle; and
3. Has satisfied the requirements of subsection (3)(a)1. and 2. of Section
8 of this Act for at least one (1) location in this state.
(b) 1. The commissioner may issue a notice of intent to issue a conditional
license to an applicant to engage in virtual currency kiosk business at
one (1) or more locations in this state if the commissioner determines
that the conditions, including any additional bond amount specified by
the commissioner under Section 9 of this Act, are necessary for the
applicant to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (a)1., 2., and 3. of
this subsection.
2. A notice of intent issued under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph
shall specify the additional conditions that are required for the
applicant to obtain and maintain a license.
3. The commissioner may issue a conditional license to an applicant to
engage in virtual currency kiosk business at one (1) or more locations
in this state if the applicant files with the commissioner a written
acceptance of the conditions specified in the notice issued under
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph to the applicant within thirty (30)
days after service of the notice.
4. If the department does not receive an applicant's written acceptance of
the conditions specified in the notice issued under subparagraph 1. of
this paragraph to the applicant within thirty (30) days after service of
the notice, the commissioner shall issue a notice of intent to deny the
applicant's application for a license.
Page 12 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
(c) 1. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the
commissioner shall issue a notice of intent to deny an applicant's
application for a license if the commissioner determines that:
a. Denial of the license is warranted under Section 25 of this Act;
or
b. The requirements of paragraph (a)1., 2., and 3. of this subsection
are not satisfied.
2. A notice of intent to deny an applicant's application for a license shall
specify the reasons for the determination.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
An application filed under Section 6 of this Act shall provide all of the following
information, documentation, and evidence unless the commissioner, for good cause,
waives any requirement of this section with respect to a license application:
(1) The following for the applicant, each executive officer, director, key shareholder,
and person in control of the applicant, and each responsible individual and
agent, as applicable:
(a) Legal name;
(b) Any former names used, including former fictitious or trade names;
(c) Any fictitious or trade names used;
(d) Business addresses;
(e) Residential addresses;
(f) Social Security number;
(g) Employment history for the ten (10) year period preceding the application
filing; and
(h) A description of the activities conducted by the person and a history of
operations, including a description of any money or virtual currency
Page 13 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
services, money transmission, or virtual currency kiosk business that has
been previously conducted in this state;
(2) The physical address of each proposed virtual currency kiosk in this state;
(3) A copy of any agreement between the applicant and each responsible individual
and agent;
(4) A list of each license or other authorization the applicant holds to conduct money
or virtual currency services, money transmission, or virtual currency kiosk
business in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction and the date each license or
authorization expires;
(5) A list of all regulatory revocations, suspensions, restrictions, and other
disciplinary actions in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, including all
rejected applications, taken against any of the following:
(a) The applicant;
(b) A responsible individual; or
(c) An agent;
(6) (a) A list and description of all criminal convictions, deferred prosecution
agreements, and pending criminal proceedings, other than traffic violations,
in any jurisdiction for the ten (10) year period preceding the filing of the
application against any of the following:
1. The applicant;
2. A responsible individual;
3. An agent;
4. An executive officer of the applicant; or
5. A key shareholder of the applicant.
(b) The commissioner may request a copy of any criminal conviction, which
shall be promptly provided within ten (10) working days of the request;
(7) (a) A list and description of all material litigation for the ten (10) year period
Page 14 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
preceding the filing of the application against any of the following:
1. The applicant;
2. A responsible individual;
3. An agent;
4. An executive officer of the applicant; or
5. A key shareholder of the applicant.
(b) The commissioner may request a copy of any material litigation, which
shall be promptly provided within ten (10) working days of the request;
(8) A list of all bankruptcy and receivership proceedings in any jurisdiction for the
past ten (10) years in which any of the following was a debtor:
(a) The applicant;
(b) A responsible individual;
(c) An agent;
(d) A person in control of the applicant; or
(e) A person over which the applicant has control;
(9) The name, business address, and telephone number of each financial institution
in which the applicant and its agents plan to deposit or clear funds obtained by or
through its virtual currency kiosk business in this state;
(10) A description of the source of funds and credit to be used by the applicant and its
agents to conduct virtual currency kiosk business in this state;
(11) A sample contract for an agent;
(12) A copy of the written procedures that will be provided by the applicant or licensee
to its responsible individuals and agents;
(13) The physical address and email address to which communications from the
department may be sent;
(14) The name, physical address, email address, and telephone number of the
applicant's registered agent for service of process in this state;
Page 15 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
(15) The name, business address, email address, and telephone number of the
applicant's chief compliance officer for virtual currency kiosk business
conducted in this state;
(16) With respect to the applicant's virtual currency kiosk business in this state, a copy
of the certificate of coverage for each liability, casualty, business interruption,
and cybersecurity insurance policy maintained by the applicant for any of the
following:
(a) Itself;
(b) A responsible individual;
(c) An agent;
(d) An affiliate of the applicant;
(e) A person in control of the applicant; or
(f) A person over which the applicant has control;
(17) If applicable:
(a) The date on which, and the state where, the applicant is formed;
(b) A copy of any current certificate of good standing issued by the state where
the applicant is formed;
(c) A copy of the applicant's filed articles of incorporation;
(d) Evidence that the applicant is registered or qualified to do business in this
state;
(e) The name, business address, and telephone number of each affiliate of the
applicant;
(f) A description of the control relationship between the applicant and each
affiliate of the applicant; and
(g) A description of the corporate or business structure of the applicant,
including:
1. The identity of any parent and subsidiary of the applicant; and
Page 16 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
2. Disclosure of whether any parent or subsidiary of the applicant is
publicly traded on any stock exchange;
(18) A copy of the following for the most recent fiscal year and, if available, for the
two (2) year period preceding filing of the application:
(a) The applicant's audited annual financial statements; or
(b) If the applicant is a wholly owned subsidiary of another corporation:
1. The audited consolidated annual financial statement of the parent
corporation; or
2. The applicant's audited consolidated annual financial statements;
(19) A copy of the applicant's unconsolidated financial statements, whether audited or
not, for:
(a) The current fiscal year; and
(b) If available, for the two (2) year period preceding the filing of the
application;
(20) If the applicant is publicly traded in the United States, a copy of the most recent
report filed by the person pursuant to 15 U.S.C. sec. 78m, as amended;
(21) If a person in control of the applicant is publicly traded in the United States, a
copy of the:
(a) Audited financial statements of the person for the most recent fiscal year; or
(b) Most recent report filed by the person pursuant to 15 U.S.C. sec. 78m, as
amended;
(22) If a person in control of the applicant is publicly traded outside the United States,
a copy of the most recent documentation filed by the person with a relevant
foreign regulator in the person's domicile that is similar to that required in
subsection (20) of this section;
(23) If the applicant or its agents are required to register with the Financial Crimes
Enforcement Network of the United States Department of the Treasury as a
Page 17 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
money service business, evidence of the registration;
(24) Any substituted information, documentation, or evidence the commissioner, for
good cause, permits for any license application in lieu of the information,
documentation, or evidence required by this section; and
(25) Any other information, documentation, or evidence the commissioner reasonably
requires to determine whether an applicant satisfies the requirements of this
subtitle.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) An applicant or licensee seeking to engage in virtual currency kiosk
business at one (1) or more locations in this state, either directly or through
an agent, shall file a complete application for approval of the location or
locations with the commissioner.
(b) An applicant or licensee seeking to designate one (1) or more agents to
engage in virtual currency kiosk business on behalf of the applicant or
licensee in this state shall file a complete application for approval of the
agent or agents with the commissioner.
(2) (a) Subject to paragraph (b) of this subsection, an application for approval to
engage in virtual currency kiosk business at one (1) or more locations, or
through one (1) or more agents, in this state shall not be complete unless it:
1. Is made in writing, under oath or affirmation;
2. Is in a format required by the commissioner;
3. Contains, and is accompanied by, the information, documentation,
and evidence required or permitted under Section 7 of this Act that the
commissioner determines is necessary and appropriate for the purpose
of making the determination under subsection (3) of this section; and
4. Is accompanied by a nonrefundable fee for each location and agent
Page 18 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
that is determined by the commissioner in accordance with Section 13
of this Act, except the commissioner may waive the nonrefundable fee
for any application that is made at the same time as a license
application under Section 6 of this Act.
(b) When an applicant seeks approval to engage in virtual currency kiosk
business at one (1) or more locations, or through one (1) or more agents, in
this state at the same time as filing a license application under Section 6 of
this Act, the commissioner may:
1. Accept the license application as the complete application required
under this section; or
2. Require the applicant to submit additional information to the
commissioner as part of the license application for each location,
agent, or location and agent.
(3) Upon receipt of a complete application in accordance with subsection (2) of this
section, and subject to Section 24 of this Act, the commissioner shall do one (1) of
the following for each proposed location and agent:
(a) The commissioner shall issue an unconditional approval to the applicant or
licensee to engage in virtual currency kiosk business at the location, or
through the agent, in this state if, after investigation, the commissioner
determines that:
1. The applicant or licensee will conduct business at the location, or
through the agent, in a lawful and proper manner; and
2. The interest of the public will not be jeopardized by the applicant or
licensee conducting business at the location or through the agent;
(b) 1. The commissioner may issue a notice of intent to issue a conditional
approval to the applicant or licensee to engage in virtual currency
kiosk business at the location, or through the agent, in this state if the
Page 19 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
commissioner, after investigation, determines that the conditions,
including any additional bond amount specified by the commissioner
under Section 9 of this Act, are necessary for the applicant or licensee
to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (a)1. and 2. of this
subsection.
2. A notice of intent issued under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph
shall specify the additional conditions that are required for the
applicant or licensee to engage in the proposed activity.
3. The commissioner may issue a conditional approval to an applicant or
licensee to engage in virtual currency kiosk business at the location,
or through the agent, in this state if the applicant or licensee files a
written acceptance of the conditions specified in the notice issued
under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph to the applicant or licensee
within thirty (30) days after service of the notice.
4. If the department does not receive an applicant's or a licensee's
written acceptance of the conditions specified in the notice issued
under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph to the applicant or licensee
within thirty (30) days after service of the notice, the commissioner
shall issue a notice of intent to deny the applicant's or licensee's
application for approval to engage in the proposed activity; or
(c) 1. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the
commissioner shall issue a notice of intent to deny the applicant's or
licensee's application to engage in virtual currency kiosk business at
the location, or through the agent, in this state if, after investigation,
the commissioner determines that:
a. For a proposed agent, denial is warranted under Section 25 of
this Act; or
Page 20 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
b. The requirements of paragraph (a)1. and 2. of this subsection
are not satisfied.
2. A notice of intent to deny an applicant's or licensee's application to
engage in virtual currency kiosk business at a location, or through an
agent, shall specify the reasons for the determination.
SECTION 9. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Bond" means:
1. A surety bond; or
2. Another similar security acceptable to the commissioner;
(b) "Net worth" means assets less liabilities as determined by generally
accepted accounting principles; and
(c) "Person" includes any applicant and licensee.
(2) (a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, an
applicant shall submit with its license application, and a licensee shall at all
times maintain, a bond in an amount that is not less than five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000).
(b) The commissioner may require an applicant to submit before a license is
issued, and a licensee to maintain at all times, a bond in an amount in
excess of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) but not exceeding five
million dollars ($5,000,000) if the commissioner determines the additional
amount is necessary to cover the nature and extent of risks associated with
the virtual currency kiosk business activity in this state of the:
1. Applicant and its proposed agents; or
2. The licensee and its agents.
(c) An applicant or a licensee that is required to increase its bond under
Page 21 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
paragraph (b) of this subsection shall submit to the commissioner evidence
that it has secured the additional bond amount not later than thirty (30)
days after the applicant or licensee is notified by the commissioner in
writing of the required increase.
(3) (a) The bond required under this section shall:
1. Be in a form satisfactory to the commissioner;
2. Hold and bind the principal and surety to the Commonwealth of
Kentucky for the benefit of any claimants against the person and its
agents to secure the faithful performance of the obligations of the
person and its agents in accordance with the requirements of this
subtitle, including the payment of unpaid fee amounts and civil
monetary penalties due to the department under this subtitle;
3. Except as provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection, cover claims
brought by a claimant for as long as the commissioner specifies, but
not less than five (5) years after the later of the following:
a. The date of any violation of this subtitle by the person or its
agents; or
b. The date the person ceases to do business in this state;
4. Be continuous and remain in effect until canceled;
5. Require the person and surety to provide the commissioner at least
thirty (30) days written notice of an intent to cancel the bond; and
6. Provide that cancellation of the bond shall not affect any liability
incurred or accrued under the bond during the thirty (30) day notice
period required under subparagraph 5. of this paragraph.
(b) The aggregate liability on a bond shall not exceed the principal sum of the
bond.
(c) A claimant may maintain a civil action on a bond.
Page 22 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
(d) The commissioner may maintain a civil action on a bond on behalf of the
department or any other claimant in the Franklin Circuit Court or in any
other court of competent jurisdiction, either in one (1) action or successive
actions.
(e) The commissioner may permit the amount of a bond to be reduced or
eliminated after a person ceases to do business in this state to the extent the
amount of a person's and its agents' outstanding obligations in this state are
reduced.
(4) In addition to the bond required under this section, an applicant shall submit
with its license application, and a licensee shall at all times maintain, evidence of
a net worth that is not less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
(5) The commissioner may promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A or issue an order to:
(a) Exercise his or her discretion under this section; or
(b) Otherwise carry out the requirements of this section.
SECTION 10. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Every applicant and licensee shall, at the time of filing a license application and at all
times during the consideration of the application and licensure:
(1) Be in good standing in its state of incorporation or formation;
(2) Be registered or qualified to do business in this state;
(3) Maintain a registered agent for service of process in this state; and
(4) (a) File a written report with the commissioner within fifteen (15) business days
of knowledge of any of the following events:
1. A material change in the information provided in:
a. A license application;
b. An application for approval to engage in virtual currency kiosk
Page 23 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
business at one (1) or more locations, or through one (1) or more
agents, in this state; or
c. Any report filed under this subtitle;
2. A failure to satisfy the requirements of Section 9 of this Act;
3. Insolvency, the filing for bankruptcy, reorganization, dissolution, or
receivership under the United States bankruptcy code or any other
law, or the making of a general assignment for the benefit of creditors
by:
a. The applicant or licensee;
b. A responsible individual;
c. An agent;
d. An executive officer of the applicant or licensee; or
e. A director of the applicant or licensee;
4. The filing of any material litigation against the applicant or licensee
by any state, federal, or foreign governmental authority; or
5. The applicant or licensee, a responsible individual or agent, or an
executive officer or director of the applicant, the licensee, or an agent
has been:
a. Indicted for or convicted of any felony; or
b. Convicted of a misdemeanor involving fraud, theft, breach of
trust, or virtual currency kiosk business in this state.
(b) The report required under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall describe
the event and its expected impact on:
1. The applicant's proposed activities in this state; or
2. The licensee's activities in this state.
SECTION 11. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 24 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
(1) As used in this section, "United States dollar equivalent of virtual currency"
means the equivalent value of virtual currency in United States dollars shown on
a virtual currency exchange based in the United States for a particular date or
period.
(2) On or before December 31 of each year, each licensee shall:
(a) Pay a nonrefundable annual renewal fee to the department that is
determined by the commissioner in accordance with Section 13 of this Act;
and
(b) File the licensee's annual renewal report with the commissioner in
accordance with subsection (5) of this section.
(3) The failure of a licensee to comply with subsection (2) of this section shall result
in the expiration of the licensee's license by operation of law on January 1 of the
following year.
(4) (a) The commissioner may reinstate an expired license if, before February 1 of
the calendar year in which the license expired, the licensee:
1. Pays the annual renewal fee and files the annual renewal report
required under subsection (2) of this section; and
2. Pays a civil penalty to the department that is equal to the amount of
the annual renewal fee determined by the commissioner in accordance
with Section 13 of this Act.
(b) Any reinstatement of a license under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall
be retroactive to January 1 of the calendar year in which the license
expired.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, each licensee shall file an
annual renewal report with the commissioner that contains all of the following:
(a) A copy of:
1. The licensee's most recent audited annual financial statement; or
Page 25 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
2. If the licensee is a wholly owned subsidiary of another corporation,
the:
a. Most recent audited consolidated annual financial statement of
the parent corporation; or
b. Licensee's most recent audited consolidated annual financial
statements;
(b) A description of the following, if the information has not been previously
reported to the commissioner on any other report filed under this subtitle:
1. Any material changes to any of the information submitted by the
licensee on its original application; and
2. Any data security breach involving the licensee;
(c) A list of the licensee's permissible investments under Section 16 of this Act;
(d) A certification from the licensee that the licensee continues to maintain
permissible investments in accordance with Section 16 of this Act;
(e) A list of each location where the licensee, or an agent of the licensee,
conducts virtual currency kiosk business in this state;
(f) For January 1 to December 31 of the preceding calendar year and January
1 to September 30 of the current year:
1. The number of virtual currency kiosk transactions at each location in
this state where the licensee, or an agent of the licensee, conducts
virtual currency kiosk business;
2. The United States dollar amount of virtual currency kiosk transactions
at each location in this state where the licensee, or an agent of the
licensee, conducts virtual currency kiosk business; and
3. The total number and dollar amount of refund requests received by
the licensee, or an agent of the licensee, from virtual currency kiosk
users that were:
Page 26 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
a. Granted by the licensee or agent; and
b. Denied by the licensee or agent;
(g) As of December 31 of the preceding calendar year and September 30 of the
current year:
1. The amount of United States dollar equivalent of virtual currency in
the possession or control of the licensee or an agent of the licensee;
2. The number of virtual currency kiosk users for whom the licensee, or
an agent of the licensee, had possession or control of virtual currency;
and
3. The amount of United States dollar equivalent of virtual currency in
the possession or control of the licensee, or an agent of the licensee,
on behalf of virtual currency kiosk users;
(h) Evidence that the licensee continues to satisfy the requirements of Section 9
of this Act;
(i) The name, business address, email address, and telephone number of the
licensee's chief compliance officer for virtual currency kiosk business
conducted in this state; and
(j) Any other information the commissioner determines is necessary to aid in
the enforcement of this subtitle.
(6) A licensee that was not licensed in Kentucky at any time between January 1 and
October 31 of a calendar year shall not be required to file an annual renewal
report for the following year.
SECTION 12. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person shall not take any action that results in a change of control of a licensee
without:
(a) Providing the notice required under subsection (2) of this section; and
Page 27 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
(b) Obtaining the prior written approval of the commissioner in accordance
with subsection (3) of this section, except this paragraph shall not apply to:
1. A person that acts as a proxy for the sole purpose of voting at a
designated meeting of the security holders or holders of voting
interests of a licensee or person in control of a licensee;
2. A person that acquires control of a licensee by devise or descent;
3. A person that acquires control as a personal representative, custodian,
guardian, conservator, or trustee, or as an officer appointed by a court
of competent jurisdiction or by operation of law;
4. A public offering of securities under the laws of the United States; or
5. a. Any other person or circumstance that the commissioner
determines is exempted from compliance with this paragraph in
an administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A.
b. The commissioner may promulgate an administrative regulation
to exempt a person or circumstance from compliance with this
paragraph if the commissioner determines that the exemption is
necessary to serve the public interest.
(2) (a) A licensee shall file a complete notice of a:
1. Change of control of the licensee under subsection (1)(b)1. to 5. of this
section with the commissioner within fifteen (15) days of learning of
the change of control; and
2. Proposed change of control of the licensee, other than a change of
control under subsection (1)(b)1. to 5. of this section, with the
commissioner:
a. Within fifteen (15) days of learning of the proposed change of
control; and
Page 28 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
b. At least thirty (30) days prior to the proposed change of control.
(b) A notice of a change of control, or a proposed change of control, of a
licensee shall not be complete unless it:
1. Is made in writing, under oath or affirmation;
2. Is in a format required by the commissioner; and
3. Contains the information that the commissioner determines is
necessary to provide reasonable notice of the licensee's change of
control or proposed change of control.
(3) (a) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, a person seeking to
acquire control of a licensee shall file a complete application for approval of
the change of control with the commissioner at least thirty (30) days prior to
the proposed change of control.
(b) An application for approval of a change of control shall not be complete
unless it:
1. Is made in writing, under oath or affirmation;
2. Is in the format required by the commissioner;
3. Contains, and is accompanied by, any or all of the information,
documentation, and evidence required or permitted for an applicant
under Section 7 of this Act that the commissioner determines is
necessary and appropriate for the purpose of making the
determination under paragraph (c) of this subsection; and
4. Is accompanied by a nonrefundable investigation fee of one hundred
dollars ($100).
(c) Upon receipt of a complete application for approval of a change of control
and subject to Section 24 of this Act, the commissioner shall:
1. Approve the application if the commissioner determines that the
person satisfies the requirements of this subtitle for obtaining a
Page 29 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
license; or
2. a. Issue a notice of intent to deny the application if the
commissioner determines that the person does not satisfy the
requirements of this subtitle for obtaining a license.
b. A notice of intent to deny an application for approval of a
change of control shall specify the requirements of this subtitle
that the person does not satisfy.
(4) (a) The commissioner may determine whether any set of facts or a proposed
transaction constitutes, or would constitute, control for purposes of this
section.
(b) Any of the following may make a request to the commissioner for a
determination under paragraph (a) of this subsection:
1. A licensee; or
2. A person that seeks to enter a proposed transaction with a licensee.
(5) (a) A licensee shall file a complete notice of the termination or resignation of a
responsible individual or agent with the commissioner within fifteen (15)
days of the termination or resignation.
(b) A notice of termination or resignation of a licensee's responsible individual
or agent shall not be complete unless it:
1. Is made in writing, under oath or affirmation;
2. Is in a format required by the commissioner; and
3. Contains the information that the commissioner determines is
necessary to provide reasonable notice of the licensee's change in
responsible individual or agent.
(6) (a) A licensee shall obtain the prior written approval of the commissioner in
accordance with this subsection prior to adding or replacing a responsible
individual.
Page 30 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
(b) A licensee shall file a complete application for approval of the addition or
replacement of a responsible individual with the commissioner.
(c) An application for approval of the addition or replacement of a responsible
individual shall not be complete unless it:
1. Is made in writing, under oath or affirmation;
2. Is in the format required by the commissioner; and
3. Contains, and is accompanied by, any or all of the information,
documentation, and evidence required or permitted under Section 7 of
this Act that the commissioner determines is necessary and
appropriate for the purpose of making the determination under
paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(d) Upon receipt of a complete application for approval of the addition or
replacement of a responsible individual and subject to Section 24 of this
Act, the commissioner shall:
1. Approve the application if the commissioner determines that the
licensee will continue to satisfy the requirements of this subtitle for
maintaining a license after the addition or replacement; or
2. a. Issue a notice of intent to deny the application if the
commissioner determines that the addition or replacement will
cause the licensee to no longer satisfy the requirements of this
subtitle for maintaining a license.
b. A notice of intent to deny an application for approval of the
addition or replacement of a responsible individual shall specify
the requirements of this subtitle that the licensee will not satisfy
if the addition or replacement is made.
SECTION 13. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 31 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the commissioner shall promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish:
(a) The format of, and manner of submission for, applications, notices, and
reports required under this subtitle;
(b) The nonrefundable application fees required under Sections 6 and 8 of this
Act;
(c) The nonrefundable annual renewal fee required under Section 11 of this
Act;
(d) Any additional information, documentation, or evidence that the
commissioner may require under Section 7 of this Act; and
(e) The information, documentation, and evidence that shall be contained in or
accompany an application or notice filed under Section 8 or 12 of this Act.
(2) (a) The nonrefundable fees required under Sections 6, 8, and 11 of this Act
shall be determined based on a reasonable estimation of the amount
required to cover the reasonable costs to the department to:
1. Review, investigate, and process the relevant applications and reports;
and
2. Enforce the requirements of this subtitle.
(b) The determination made under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall take
into account any other costs, fees, and expenses that are otherwise payable
to the commissioner under this subtitle.
SECTION 14. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Virtual currency kiosk operators desiring to engage in virtual currency kiosk
business through agents shall authorize each agent to operate pursuant to an
express written contract, which shall include the following provisions:
(a) That the operator designates the person as its agent with authority to
Page 32 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
engage in virtual currency kiosk business on behalf of the operator as
authorized under this subtitle;
(b) That the agent shall operate in full compliance with this subtitle,
administrative regulations promulgated under this subtitle, and any order
issued by the commissioner pursuant to this subtitle;
(c) That both the operator and the agent shall not authorize subagents;
(d) That the agent shall timely remit all legal tender and virtual currency
legally due to the operator in accordance with the terms of the written
contract between the operator and the agent;
(e) That the operator and agent are subject to regulation by the commissioner;
and
(f) That the operator and agent shall comply with all applicable federal and
state laws.
(2) An agent shall not make any fraudulent statements or misrepresentations to:
(a) The virtual currency kiosk operator; or
(b) The commissioner, including any person acting under the commissioner's
authority.
(3) All virtual currency kiosk business conducted by agents shall be strictly
conducted in accordance with the virtual currency kiosk operator's written
procedures provided to the agent.
(4) (a) An agent shall timely remit all legal tender and virtual currency legally due
to the virtual currency kiosk operator in accordance with the terms of the
written contract between the licensee and the agent.
(b) The commissioner shall have the discretion to set, by administrative
regulation or order, the maximum remittance time.
(5) An agent shall act only as authorized under the written contract with the virtual
currency kiosk operator.
Page 33 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
(6) (a) All funds, less fees, received by an agent of a virtual currency kiosk
operator from virtual currency kiosk business shall, from the time the funds
are received by the agent until such time when the funds or an equivalent
amount are remitted by the agent to the operator, constitute trust funds
owned by and belonging to the operator.
(b) If an agent commingles any of these funds with any other funds or property
owned or controlled by the agent, then all commingled proceeds and other
property shall be impressed with a trust in favor of the virtual currency
kiosk operator in an amount equal to the amount of the proceeds due the
operator.
(7) An agent shall report to the virtual currency kiosk operator the theft, forgery, or
loss of the operator's or a virtual currency kiosk user's funds within twenty-four
(24) hours from the time the agent learned of the theft, forgery, or loss.
SECTION 15. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Each virtual currency kiosk operator and its agents shall:
(a) Maintain the books, accounts, and records of its virtual currency kiosk
business activities in this state that are required under subsection (2) of this
section; and
(b) Keep the books, accounts, and records referenced in paragraph (a) of this
subsection for:
1. A period of time determined by the commissioner in an administrative
regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A; or
2. For a period that is longer than the period referenced in subparagraph
1. of this paragraph if required by:
a. Other state or federal law; or
b. The commissioner to resolve any examination, investigation, or
Page 34 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
claim.
(2) The following books, accounts, and records shall be maintained:
(a) For each virtual currency kiosk transaction:
1. The amount, date, and precise time of the transaction;
2. Any payment instructions for the transaction;
3. The total amount of virtual currency kiosk charges received by and
paid to the virtual currency kiosk operator or agent, including any
virtual currency kiosk charges received on behalf of the operator or
agent;
4. The exchange rate of the virtual currency to the United States dollar;
and
5. The names, account numbers, and physical addresses of the parties to
the transaction;
(b) A general ledger containing all assets, liabilities, ownership equity, income,
and expense accounts;
(c) Bank statements and bank reconciliation records;
(d) Any receipts, statements, and valuations provided to virtual currency kiosk
users and account holders;
(e) Records or minutes of meetings of the board of directors or an equivalent
governing body of the virtual currency kiosk operator or agent;
(f) Records demonstrating compliance with applicable state and federal anti-
money laundering laws, including virtual currency kiosk user and account
holder identification and verification documents, records linking virtual
currency kiosk users and account holders to their respective accounts and
balances, and a record of any compliance breaches;
(g) Communications and documentation related to:
1. Investigations of virtual currency kiosk user and account holder
Page 35 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
complaints; and
2. Transaction error resolutions;
(h) The policies required under Section 18 of this Act; and
(i) Any other books, accounts, or records that are required by the
commissioner in an administrative regulation promulgated in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A for determining whether a virtual currency kiosk
operator or agent is in compliance with this subtitle, including whether an
operator or agent is in compliance with any administrative regulation
promulgated, or order issued, under this subtitle.
(3) The books, accounts, and records that are required to be maintained under this
section:
(a) May be maintained in any electronic format consistent with the virtual
currency kiosk operator's or agent's ordinary business practices unless the
operator or agent receives specific written instructions from the
commissioner to the contrary;
(b) Shall be maintained separate and apart from any other business in which
the virtual currency kiosk operator or agent is involved;
(c) Shall be kept at the virtual currency kiosk operator's or agent's principal
office or an office located in this state unless otherwise permitted in writing
by the commissioner; and
(d) Shall be made available for review or examination at a nonresidential
location approved by the commissioner.
(4) Books, accounts, or records of any person described in this section may be
maintained at a location outside of this state so long as they are made accessible
to the commissioner upon seven (7) business days' written notice.
SECTION 16. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 36 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
(1) Every virtual currency kiosk operator shall, at all times, maintain permissible
investments that:
(a) Have a market value that is computed in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles; and
(b) Are not less than the aggregate amount of all of the operator's and its
agents' outstanding virtual currency kiosk transactions.
(2) Except to the extent otherwise limited in subsection (3) of this section, the
investments permitted under KRS 286.11-015 are permissible for a virtual
currency kiosk operator.
(3) The commissioner may:
(a) Limit the extent to which a type of investment within a class of permissible
investments may be considered a permissible investment, except for money,
time deposits, savings deposits, demand deposits, and certificates of deposit
issued by a federally insured financial institution; and
(b) By administrative regulation or order allow other types of investments that
the commissioner determines to be substantially equivalent to other
permissible investments in regards to safety and soundness.
(4) Permissible investments, even if commingled with other assets of the virtual
currency kiosk operator, shall be deemed by operation of law to be held in trust
for the benefit of the purchasers and holders of the operator's outstanding virtual
currency kiosk transactions in the event of the operator's insolvency or
bankruptcy.
SECTION 17. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "New virtual currency kiosk user":
1. Means a virtual currency kiosk user:
Page 37 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
a. On the day of the user's first virtual currency kiosk transaction
with the virtual currency kiosk operator; and
b. For twenty-nine (29) calendar days thereafter; and
2. Does not include a virtual currency kiosk user on any day that the
user enters a virtual currency kiosk transaction with the virtual
currency kiosk operator following twenty-nine (29) calendar days after
the user's first virtual currency kiosk transaction with the operator;
(b) "Virtual currency kiosk operator" includes an agent of the virtual currency
kiosk operator;
(c) "Virtual currency wallet" means a software application or other
mechanism providing a means to hold the keys necessary to access and
transfer virtual currency; and
(d) "Virtual currency wallet address" means an alphanumeric identifier
associated with a virtual currency wallet that identifies the location to which
a virtual currency transaction can be sent.
(2) A virtual currency kiosk operator shall:
(a) Have maximum virtual currency kiosk transaction limits that do not exceed:
1. Two thousand dollars ($2,000), or the equivalent in virtual currency,
per day for all virtual currency kiosk transactions entered with a
virtual currency kiosk user; and
2. Ten thousand five hundred dollars ($10,500), or the equivalent in
virtual currency, for all virtual currency kiosk transactions entered
with a new virtual currency kiosk user;
(b) Either:
1. Wait seventy-two (72) hours before processing a virtual currency kiosk
transaction for a new virtual currency kiosk user; or
2. At the operator's cost, allow a new virtual currency kiosk user to
Page 38 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
cancel, and receive a full refund for, a virtual currency kiosk
transaction within seventy-two (72) hours after the transaction;
(c) Not collect, directly or indirectly, virtual currency kiosk charges from a
virtual currency kiosk user for any single virtual currency kiosk transaction
that exceeds the greater of:
1. Five dollars ($5); or
2. Eighteen percent (18%) of the value, in United States dollars, of the
transaction;
(d) Provide live customer service via a toll-free telephone number during the
operating hours of each virtual currency kiosk in this state; and
(e) Provide a notice at each virtual currency kiosk in this state that:
1. Describes, in general terms, common scam tactics involving virtual
currency kiosks;
2. Advises virtual currency kiosk users not to proceed with a transaction
if the user:
a. Is being instructed or pressured by a third party; or
b. Suspects fraud;
3. States that a government agency or official will never request payment
using a virtual currency kiosk;
4. Directs virtual currency kiosk users to contact the following to report
fraud or suspected fraud:
a. Any relevant state and local law enforcement;
b. The department; and
c. The Attorney General;
5. Provides the contact information, including a telephone number, for
each of the agencies referenced in subparagraph 4. of this paragraph;
6. Provides the name, address, and toll-free customer service telephone
Page 39 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
number of the virtual currency kiosk operator;
7. Provides the days, time, and means by which a virtual currency kiosk
user can contact the virtual currency kiosk operator for assistance;
and
8. Provides the operator's dedicated United States telephone number or
email address for law enforcement, the department, and the Attorney
General, as required under subsection (6) of Section 18 of this Act.
(3) The notices required under subsection (2)(e) of this section shall be:
(a) 1. On the virtual currency kiosk;
2. Near, and within readable sight of, the virtual currency kiosk; or
3. On the first screen of the virtual currency kiosk, which shall be
viewable by any person without requiring the person to input money,
virtual currency, data, or information; and
(b) Displayed prominently and in bold type.
(4) (a) Prior to entering a virtual currency kiosk transaction with a virtual
currency kiosk user, a virtual currency kiosk operator shall:
1. Provide accurate and appropriate disclosures to the user; and
2. Obtain an acknowledgment from the user that the user received the
disclosures.
(b) The disclosures required under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall:
1. Describe the terms and conditions of the transaction, which shall
include but not be limited to:
a. The amount of the transaction;
b. A description of all virtual currency kiosk charges, which shall
be disclosed to the user in United States dollars; and
c. The exchange rate of the virtual currency to the United States
dollar;
Page 40 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
2. Describe all material risks associated with the virtual currency kiosk
transaction, including the following:
a. Virtual currency is not legal tender in the United States, is not
backed by the United States government, and accounts and value
balances are not subject to Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation, National Credit Union Administration, or
Securities Investor Protection Corporation protections;
b. Virtual currency value relative to the United States dollar may
fluctuate significantly;
c. Transactions in virtual currency may result in losses due to
fraudulent or accidental transactions that are not recoverable;
and
d. The circumstances under which the virtual currency kiosk
operator will, in the ordinary course of business, disclose the
user's financial and account information to third parties;
3. Include any other terms, conditions, or information the commissioner
determines is necessary and appropriate to disclose to virtual currency
kiosk users;
4. Be made separately from any other information provided by a virtual
currency kiosk operator; and
5. Be clear, conspicuous, and in legible writing.
(5) (a) Upon completion of a virtual currency kiosk transaction, a virtual currency
kiosk operator shall provide a receipt in paper or electronic retainable form,
as designated under paragraph (b) of this subsection, to the virtual currency
kiosk user that contains all of the following information:
1. The name and toll-free customer service telephone number of the
operator;
Page 41 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
2. The contact information required under subsection (2)(e)5. of this
section to report fraud or suspected fraud;
3. The type, value, date, and precise time of the transaction;
4. Each applicable virtual currency wallet address and transaction hash,
where available;
5. A description of all virtual currency kiosk charges, which shall be
disclosed in United States dollars;
6. The exchange rate of the virtual currency to the United States dollar;
7. The operator's liability for nondelivery or delayed delivery;
8. The operator's refund policy; and
9. Any additional information required by the commissioner.
(b) Each virtual currency kiosk user shall be provided the option to receive a
paper or electronic receipt for each virtual currency kiosk transaction.
(6) A virtual currency kiosk operator may provide additional notices or disclosures,
or information on a receipt provided, to a virtual currency kiosk user.
(7) A fraud victim's eligibility for a refund shall not be waived, affected, or prevented
by, or due to, a disclosure made in accordance with this section.
(8) The notices, disclosures, and receipts required under this section shall be in the
English language.
(9) The commissioner may promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A to:
(a) Establish the format and content of the notices required under subsection
(2)(e) of this section;
(b) Establish any additional disclosures or information the commissioner
requires under subsection (4) or (5) of this section; and
(c) Require virtual currency kiosk operators to comply with one (1) or more
specified industry standards or practices if the commissioner determines
Page 42 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
that compliance with the standard or practice is necessary to:
1. Ensure the lawful conduct of business under this subtitle; or
2. Protect the interest of the public.
SECTION 18. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Blockchain analytics" means the analysis of data from blockchains or
publicly distributed ledgers, including associated transaction information;
(b) "Blockchain analytics and tracing software" means a software service that
uses blockchain analytics data to provide:
1. Risk-specific information;
2. Tracing of virtual currency wallet addresses; and
3. Other information and services; and
(c) "Virtual currency wallet" and "virtual currency wallet address" have the
same meanings as in Section 17 of this Act.
(2) (a) Each virtual currency kiosk operator shall take reasonable steps to detect
and prevent fraud and money laundering associated with its virtual
currency kiosk business in this state.
(b) The reasonable steps required under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall
include establishing, implementing, maintaining, and enforcing:
1. An anti-fraud and anti-money laundering policy that, at a minimum:
a. Identifies and assesses fraud-related and money laundering-
related risk areas;
b. Establishes procedures and controls to protect against identified
risks;
c. Allocates responsibility for monitoring risks;
d. Establishes procedures for the periodic evaluation and revision
Page 43 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
of the policy's procedures, controls, and monitoring
mechanisms; and
e. Requires compliance with the federal Bank Secrecy Act, codified
at 31 U.S.C. sec. 5311 et seq.;
2. An enhanced due diligence policy that, at a minimum, establishes
protocols to identify individuals who are at risk of fraud based on age
or mental capacity; and
3. Policies that address:
a. Cybersecurity, the privacy of personal information, and
information security; and
b. Any other subjects required by the commissioner in an
administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A.
(c) The policies required under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall:
1. Be in writing;
2. Apply to all employees and agents of the virtual currency kiosk
operator; and
3. Be reviewed and approved by the virtual currency kiosk operator's
board of directors or equivalent governing body.
(3) (a) Each virtual currency kiosk operator and its agents shall use blockchain
analytics and tracing software to:
1. Assist in the prevention of sending virtual currency to a virtual
currency wallet known or likely to be affiliated with fraudulent activity
at the time of a virtual currency kiosk transaction; and
2. Detect virtual currency kiosk transaction patterns that are indicative
of fraud or other illicit activities.
(b) A virtual currency kiosk operator and its agents shall block a virtual
Page 44 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
currency kiosk transaction to a virtual currency wallet that is associated
with overseas exchanges that are not accessible for virtual currency kiosk
users in the United States.
(c) The department may request evidence from any virtual currency kiosk
operator or agent of current use of blockchain analytics.
(4) (a) Prior to accepting payment from any virtual currency kiosk user in this
state, a virtual currency kiosk operator and its agents shall verify the
identity of the user.
(b) To comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection, the virtual currency kiosk
operator or agent, or an authorized delegate of the operator or agent, shall:
1. Obtain a copy of a government-issued identification card that
identifies the virtual currency kiosk user; and
2. Collect additional information about the virtual currency kiosk user,
including the user's:
a. Name;
b. Date of birth;
c. Telephone number;
d. Physical address; and
e. Email address.
(c) A virtual currency kiosk operator and its agents shall not allow a virtual
currency kiosk user to engage in a virtual currency kiosk transaction under
or using any name, account, or identity that is not the user's own true name,
account, or identity.
(d) A virtual currency kiosk operator and its agents shall be strictly liable for
any violation of this subsection.
(5) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, upon request of a
virtual currency kiosk user, a virtual currency kiosk operator and its agents
Page 45 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
shall issue a refund of all virtual currency kiosk charges to the user for
each virtual currency kiosk transaction that satisfies all of the following:
1. The user was fraudulently induced to engage in the transaction;
2. The user reported the fraud within ninety (90) days of the transaction
to:
a. The operator or agent; and
b. One (1) of the following:
i. The department;
ii. The Attorney General; or
iii. Any relevant state or local law enforcement agency; and
3. The user submitted proof of the fraud to the operator or agent and the
person referenced in subparagraph 2.b. of this paragraph, which may
include one (1) of the following:
a. A police report; or
b. A sworn statement made to the department, Attorney General,
operator, or agent;
that details the fraudulent nature of the transaction.
(b) 1. In addition to any other remedies and penalties available under this
subtitle or any other statutory or common law, a virtual currency kiosk
operator and its agents shall issue a refund to a virtual currency kiosk
user in the full amount of any virtual currency kiosk transaction,
including all virtual currency kiosk charges, if the user submits proof,
which may be in the form of a police report or sworn statement, that
the operator or agent, or an employee or other representative of the
operator or agent, defrauded, deceived, or mislead the user in
connection with the transaction.
2. A virtual currency kiosk user shall submit the proof required under
Page 46 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
this paragraph in accordance with the requirements of paragraph (a)
of this subsection, except the user shall be required to submit the proof
within any applicable statute of limitations associated with the
violation or offense, which shall not be less than one (1) year after the
transaction.
(c) The refund required under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection shall be:
1. Paid in the originating currency; and
2. Made to a virtual currency kiosk user by the virtual currency kiosk
operator or agent within seventy-two (72) hours after the requirements
of paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, as applicable, are satisfied.
(6) (a) A virtual currency kiosk operator and its agents shall provide a dedicated
and frequently monitored communications line for law enforcement, the
department, and the Attorney General, via a United States telephone
number or email address posted on each virtual currency kiosk in
accordance with Section 17 of this Act, to be used by the agencies to
facilitate communications with the operator or agent in the event of a report
from a virtual currency kiosk user of fraud or suspected fraud.
(b) Upon request from law enforcement, the department, or the Attorney
General, a virtual currency kiosk operator and its agents shall:
1. Provide the agency with its trace findings; and
2. Grant the agency assistance with blockchain analytics to assist in any
fraud investigation.
(c) A virtual currency kiosk operator and its agents shall cooperate with law
enforcement, the department, and the Attorney General in the investigation
of fraud and other unlawful activity, which shall include without limitation:
1. Promptly complying with lawful subpoenas, court orders, and other
official requests for records or information relating to virtual currency
Page 47 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
kiosk transactions or virtual currency kiosk users;
2. Responding in good faith to lawful requests relating to fraud involving
a virtual currency kiosk; and
3. Designating a point of contact for communication with law
enforcement, the department, and the Attorney General regarding
fraud-related matters.
(7) (a) Each virtual currency kiosk operator shall designate a qualified natural
person to serve as the operator's chief compliance officer for virtual
currency kiosk business conducted in this state.
(b) The chief compliance officer shall be responsible for coordinating,
monitoring, and ensuring the operator's and its agents' compliance with:
1. This section; and
2. All other applicable state and federal laws, including all
administrative regulations, rules, and orders promulgated or issued
thereunder.
SECTION 19. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
It shall be a violation of this subtitle for an applicant, a licensee, a virtual currency
kiosk operator, an agent, or any other person to do any of the following:
(1) With regard to virtual currency kiosk business in this state, whether or not the
person is required to have a license:
(a) Directly or indirectly employ any scheme, device, or artifice to defraud or
mislead, when the applicant, licensee, operator, agent, or person should
have known that the scheme, device, or artifice was defrauding or
misleading; or
(b) Engage in any:
1. Unfair or deceptive practice; or
Page 48 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
2. Other act or conduct that would warrant the denial, suspension, or
revocation of a license under Section 25 of this Act;
(2) Negligently make any false statement, or knowingly or willfully make any
omission of material fact, in connection with:
(a)_ Any information or reports relating to virtual currency kiosk business in
this state filed with:
1. A state or federal government agency;
2. The registry, as defined in Section 5 of this Act; or
3. Any agency or authority, as part of a nationwide licensing system, that
is designated by the commissioner to accept filings under Section 5 of
this Act; or
(b) Any investigation or examination conducted by the commissioner or any
other state or federal government agency relating to virtual currency kiosk
business in this state; or
(3) Fail to truthfully account for any assets in connection with any virtual currency
kiosk transaction.
SECTION 20. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
In addition to the requirements of this subtitle, every virtual currency kiosk operator
and its agents shall comply with all applicable federal and state laws.
SECTION 21. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any person may file a written complaint with the commissioner relating to:
(a) Virtual currency kiosk business in this state; or
(b) The conduct of any person engaged or participating in virtual currency
kiosk business in this state.
(2) The commissioner may conduct an investigation, upon complaint or otherwise, of
Page 49 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
any virtual currency kiosk operator or other person within or outside this state
that he or she deems necessary to:
(a) Discover violations of this subtitle, including violations of any
administrative regulation promulgated, or order issued, under this subtitle;
or
(b) Secure information necessary for the proper enforcement of this subtitle.
(3) (a) The commissioner may conduct routine examinations of the virtual
currency kiosk affairs, business, offices, books, accounts, and records of
licensees and agents of licensees.
(b) A licensee shall pay a reasonable fee sufficient to cover the cost of each
routine examination based upon fair compensation for time and actual
expenses.
(c) Upon written notice of the amount assessed under paragraph (b) of this
subsection, the licensee shall become liable for and pay the assessment to
the department.
(4) To the extent necessary to conduct any investigation or examination authorized
under this section, the commissioner may:
(a) Compel the attendance of any person or obtain any books, accounts, or
records by subpoenas;
(b) Administer oaths and affirmations;
(c) Examine under oath or affirmation all persons whose testimony he or she
may require; and
(d) To the extent permitted under federal law, access and review records and
related information relating to compliance with federal anti-money
laundering laws, including suspicious activity reports filed pursuant to the
Bank Secrecy Act, 31 U.S.C. sec. 5311 et seq., as amended.
(5) As a condition of licensure under this subtitle, a licensee and its agents shall, by
Page 50 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
operation of law, be deemed to consent to any examination or investigation
conducted under this section, whether or not prior notice is given to the licensee
or agent.
(6) When conducting an investigation or examination, the commissioner may do any
of the following:
(a) Conduct an on-site or off-site investigation or examination;
(b) Participate in a joint or concurrent investigation or examination with one
(1) or more states or federal agencies, including a multistate investigation
or examination; and
(c) Accept and rely upon an investigation or examination report of one (1) or
more states or federal agencies, including a multistate investigation or
examination report.
(7) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection and Section 22 of
this Act, a routine examination report, related correspondence, and
examination-related information shall:
1. Be considered confidential by law and privileged; and
2. Not be subject to disclosure under KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(b) A licensee:
1. May disclose a Kentucky routine examination report to a financial
institution upon written request from the financial institution for the
purpose of assisting the financial institution in its compliance with the
Bank Secrecy Act, 31 U.S.C. secs. 5311 to 5332 and 31 C.F.R. pt. 103;
and
2. Shall provide written notice to the commissioner of a disclosure made
under this paragraph at the same time that the disclosure is made.
SECTION 22. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 51 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, any document,
material, report, or other information in the possession or control of the
commissioner that is provided to the commissioner according to this subtitle
shall:
(a) Be confidential by law and privileged;
(b) Not be subject to disclosure under KRS 61.870 to 61.884; and
(c) Not be subject to subpoena or discovery, or admissible as evidence in any
civil action, unless the commissioner determines or, after notice to the
commissioner and a hearing, a court of competent jurisdiction determines
that the commissioner would not be prejudiced by disclosure of the
document, material, report, or information.
(2) (a) The commissioner shall not be required to testify in any civil action
concerning any document, material, report, or information that is
confidential under subsection (1) of this section.
(b) Any person who received documents, materials, reports, or other
information that is confidential under subsection (1) of this section while
acting under the authority of the commissioner shall not be required to
testify in any civil action concerning the documents, materials, reports, or
other information.
(3) In order to assist in the performance of the commissioner's duties, the
commissioner may do all of the following:
(a) Share or disclose documents, materials, reports, and other information in
the commissioner's possession or control, including otherwise confidential
and privileged documents, materials, reports, and other information:
1. In accordance with Section 5 of this Act;
2. In accordance with a joint, concurrent, or multistate investigation or
examination conducted under Section 21 of this Act; or
Page 52 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
3. With the following, if the recipient agrees to maintain the
confidentiality and privileged status of shared documents, materials,
reports, and information:
a. Other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies;
b. Organizations made up of other state regulators of virtual
currency businesses; and
c. Local, state, federal, and international law enforcement
authorities;
(b) Report apparent violations of law to:
1. Other state, federal, and international regulators of virtual currency
businesses;
2. The registry, as defined in Section 5 of this Act; or
3. Local, state, federal, and international law enforcement authorities;
(c) Disclose to the public:
1. A list of licensees and agents;
2. A licensee's registered agent for service of process in this state;
3. The aggregate financial or other data of persons regulated under this
subtitle; or
4. Violations of this subtitle, enforcement actions, and other relevant
information that the commissioner deems necessary to carry out the
requirements and purposes of this subtitle;
(d) Disclose and use documents, materials, reports, and other information in
the commissioner's possession or control, including otherwise confidential
and privileged documents, materials, reports, and other information, in
furtherance of any regulatory or legal action brought as part of the
commissioner's official duties;
(e) Receive any documents, materials, reports, or other information, including
Page 53 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials, reports, or
other information, from any source;
(f) Agree to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of any
documents, materials, reports, or information received;
(g) Enter into agreements or relationships with other government officials,
federal and state regulatory agencies, and regulatory associations;
(h) Use, hire, contract, or employ analytical systems, methods, or software;
(i) Consider, accept, and rely upon audit reports prepared by an independent
certified public accountant or other qualified third-party auditor for any
person subject to this subtitle; or
(j) Incorporate all or part of any audit report referenced in paragraph (i) of
this subsection into an examination or investigation report.
(4) A waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality in documents,
materials, reports, or other information shall not occur as a result of a disclosure:
(a) To the commissioner under this section; or
(b) That is made under subsection (3)(a) of this section.
SECTION 23. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
The commissioner shall prepare and publish for public distribution on the
department's website an annual report that details and summarizes, in composite form:
(1) The data received from virtual currency kiosk operators relating to virtual
currency kiosk business conducted in this state; and
(2) Information about the licensing of virtual currency kiosk business in this state,
including the following information, by calendar year:
(a) The number of applications made for a license;
(b) The number of applicants who have a license to engage in money
transmission;
Page 54 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
(c) The number of licenses granted;
(d) The number of applicants who have been denied a license; and
(e) A list of fees that applicants are required to pay.
SECTION 24. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Applicant" includes:
1. With respect to conditions placed on, or denial of an application for,
an approval to engage in virtual currency kiosk business through an
agent in this state, a proposed agent; and
2. With respect to a denial of an application for approval of a change of
control, a person that filed the application seeking the change of
control; and
(b) "Person" means any applicant, licensee, virtual currency kiosk operator,
agent, or other person.
(2) The commissioner shall serve written notice on an applicant prior to:
(a) Placing conditions on:
1. A license; or
2. An approval to engage in virtual currency kiosk business at a location,
or through an agent, in this state; or
(b) Denying any license or application made under this subtitle.
(3) An applicant that is served a notice of intent to deny any license or application
made under this subtitle shall be entitled to an administrative hearing on the
notice conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B if the applicant files a
written request for a hearing with the commissioner within twenty (20) days of
the date of service.
(4) (a) The commissioner shall serve an administrative complaint on a person:
Page 55 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
1. Prior to doing any of the following:
a. Taking an adverse action against the person under subsection
(1)(a)4. of Section 25 of this Act;
b. Issuing a cease and desist order against the person under
Section 27 of this Act; or
c. Issuing an order that directs the person to:
i. Pay any fee or civil penalty;
ii. Provide any remedy; or
iii. Be subject to a penalty; and
2. Simultaneous with the service of an emergency order on the person
under Section 26 of this Act.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, a person that is
served an administrative complaint under paragraph (a) of this subsection
shall be entitled to an administrative hearing on the complaint conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B if the person files both of the following
with the commissioner within twenty (20) days of the date of service:
1. A written answer to the complaint; and
2. A request for hearing.
(c) A person that complies with paragraph (b) of this subsection in response to
an administrative complaint and emergency order issued under Section 25
of this Act shall be entitled to an emergency administrative hearing
conducted in accordance with KRS 13B.125.
(5) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the commissioner
shall serve any notice, complaint, or emergency order referenced in this
section by certified mail or personal delivery to the person's last known
address or upon the person's agent for service of process.
(b) If the commissioner is unable to reasonably determine a person's last
Page 56 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
known address or agent for service of process, the commissioner may serve
a notice, a complaint, or an emergency order by certified mail or personal
delivery to any owner or operator of the premises or real property upon
which the person's virtual currency kiosk or kiosks are located.
(6) Service by certified mail shall be complete as provided in KRS 13B.050(2).
(7) If any person fails to timely file a request for hearing under subsection (3) of this
section, or a written answer and request for hearing under subsection (4) of this
section, the commissioner may, as applicable and subject to KRS Chapter 13B,
issue a final order:
(a) Taking the action that was:
1. Set forth in the notice; or
2. Sought in the complaint; or
(b) Affirming the emergency action that was taken.
(8) All other requirements of and rights arising under KRS Chapter 13B shall apply
to administrative hearings conducted and orders issued under this subtitle.
(9) The commissioner may, at any time, enter into a consent order with any person to
resolve a matter arising under this subtitle.
SECTION 25. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Adverse action" means to take any of the following actions:
1. Deny or condition a license;
2. Deny, in whole or in part, an application to engage in virtual currency
kiosk business at one (1) or more locations, or through one (1) or
more agents, in this state;
3. Condition an approval:
a. To engage in virtual currency kiosk business at a location in this
Page 57 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
state; or
b. Of an agent to engage in virtual currency kiosk business in this
state on behalf of an applicant or licensee; or
4. Suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew:
a. A license;
b. An approval to engage in virtual currency kiosk business at a
location in this state; or
c. An approval of an agent to engage in virtual currency kiosk
business in this state on behalf of a licensee;
(b) "Regulated person" means any applicant, licensee, or agent; and
(c) 1. "Unsafe or unsound act or practice" means an act or practice that:
a. Creates a likelihood of material loss, insolvency, or dissipation of
a regulated person's assets; or
b. Materially prejudices the:
i. Financial condition of a regulated person; or
ii. Interests of a regulated person's customers.
2. In determining whether a regulated person has engaged, or is
engaging, in an unsafe or unsound act or practice, the commissioner
may consider:
a. The size and condition of the person's business;
b. The magnitude of the loss;
c. The gravity of the violation of this subtitle;
d. Any action taken by another state or federal government against
the person; and
e. The previous conduct of the person.
(2) Subject to Section 24 of this Act and KRS 335B.020, the commissioner may take
an adverse action against a regulated person if the commissioner finds one (1) or
Page 58 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
more of the following:
(a) The regulated person has:
1. Violated any:
a. Provision of this subtitle;
b. Other state or federal law related to money transmission or
virtual currency kiosk business; or
c. Consent order or compliance agreement entered into with the
commissioner;
2. Engaged in:
a. An unsafe or unsound act or practice;
b. An unfair, deceptive, or dishonest act or practice;
c. Fraud, an intentional misrepresentation, or gross negligence; or
d. A misappropriation of legal tender, virtual currency, or other
assets;
3. Misrepresented material facts or made a false promise likely to
influence, persuade, or induce a virtual currency kiosk user to engage
in a virtual currency kiosk transaction;
4. Misrepresented or concealed a material fact, term, or condition of a
virtual currency kiosk transaction;
5. Knowingly engaged in a transaction, practice, or course of business
that perpetrates a fraud upon any person in connection with a virtual
currency kiosk transaction;
6. Failed to exchange, transfer, or store, without just cause, any funds in
accordance with any agreement connected with a virtual currency
kiosk business;
7. Failed to timely remit, account for, or deliver to any person any legal
tender, virtual currency, precious metals, electronic certificates, or
Page 59 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
other assets legally due to the person;
8. Failed to implement reasonable risk-mitigation measures to prevent
fraudulent activity by third parties in connection with a virtual
currency kiosk transaction;
9. Been found to have violated any of the recordkeeping and reporting
requirements of the United States government, including 31 U.S.C.
secs. 5311 to 5332 and 31 C.F.R. pt. 103;
10. Been convicted of, pled guilty to, or pled nolo contendere, or
knowingly employed or contracted with a responsible individual that
has been convicted of, pled guilty to, or pled nolo contendere, to a:
a. Felony; or
b. A misdemeanor:
i. Related to money transmission or virtual currency kiosk
business; or
ii. Involving theft, fraud, or breach of trust; or
11. Has had any license, registration, claim of exemption, or other
authorization to do business relating to the financial services industry
denied, revoked, suspended, conditioned, restricted, probated, or
terminated by any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction;
(b) The regulated person:
1. Is insolvent;
2. Has suspended payment of its obligations or made a general
assignment for the benefit of its creditors;
3. Has:
a. Become the debtor, alleged debtor, respondent, or person in a
similar capacity in a case or other proceeding under any
bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, readjustment,
Page 60 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
insolvency, receivership, dissolution, liquidation, or similar law;
and
b. Not obtained from a court, within a reasonable time,
confirmation of a plan or dismissal of the case or proceeding; or
4. Has applied for, or has permitted the appointment of, a receiver,
trustee, or other agent of a court for itself or for a substantial part of
its assets;
(c) The regulated person has knowingly made or provided, or caused to be
made or provided, to the commissioner one (1) or more of the following:
1. A material misrepresentation; or
2. A false or fraudulent:
a. Material fact; or
b. Financial statement;
(d) The applicant or licensee suppressed or withheld from the commissioner
any information which, if submitted by the applicant or licensee, warrants
or would have warranted the commissioner denying a license;
(e) The applicant or licensee failed to terminate or suspend the authority of its
responsible individual or agent to act on its behalf when the applicant or
licensee knew, or was given reasonable notice, that its responsible
individual or agent:
1. Violated, or was about to violate, a material provision of this subtitle,
including any administrative regulation or order promulgated or
issued by the commissioner; or
2. Engaged in, or was about to engage in, an act or practice that would
warrant an adverse action under this section;
(f) Any of the following are listed on the specially designated nationals and
blocked persons list prepared by the United States Department of the
Page 61 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
Treasury or the United States Department of State under Presidential
Executive Order No. 13224 as a potential threat to commit terrorist acts or
to finance terrorist acts:
1. The regulated person;
2. An executive officer of the regulated person;
3. A director of the regulated person;
4. A key shareholder of the regulated person;
5. A person in control of the regulated person; or
6. A responsible individual of the applicant or licensee;
(g) The competence, experience, character, or general fitness of an agent, or a
person in control of the agent, indicates that it is not in the public interest to
permit the agent to be engaged in virtual currency kiosk business in this
state;
(h) The applicant or licensee no longer meets the requirements of this subtitle
to:
1. Hold a license; or
2. Engage in virtual currency kiosk business at one (1) or more locations
in this state; or
(i) Any fact or condition exists that, if it existed at the time the applicant or
licensee applied for a license, or approval to engage in virtual currency
kiosk business at one (1) or more locations, or through one (1) or more
agents, in this state, would have been grounds for denying the application.
(3) Subsection (2)(a)1. of this section includes all of the following:
(a) Violating any administrative regulation promulgated, or order of general
application issued, under this subtitle;
(b) Failing to pay any fee, civil penalty, or remedy that is owed under this
subtitle;
Page 62 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
(c) Violating the written conditions under which a license or approval was
issued, renewed, or maintained under this subtitle;
(d) Refusing to permit, or failing to cooperate substantially with, an
investigation or examination under this subtitle;
(e) Failing, within a reasonable time, to furnish any information or file any
notice or report required or otherwise requested by the commissioner under
this subtitle; and
(f) Failing to comply with a lawful order or subpoena issued by the
commissioner.
(4) Subject to Section 24 of this Act:
(a) The commissioner may, at any time, issue a notice of intent to impose
conditions on a license, or approval to engage in virtual currency kiosk
business at one (1) or more locations, or through one (1) or more agents, in
this state if the commissioner finds that the conditions, including any
additional bond amount specified by the commissioner under Section 9 of
this Act, are necessary for a licensee to continue to satisfy the requirements
of this subtitle for licensure;
(b) A notice of intent issued under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall specify
the additional conditions that are required for the licensee and any agent;
(c) The commissioner may impose conditions on a license, or approval to
engage in virtual currency kiosk business at one (1) or more locations, or
through one (1) or more agents, in this state if the licensee, agent, or both,
as applicable, files a written acceptance of the conditions specified in the
notice issued under paragraph (a) of this subsection to the licensee, agent,
or both within thirty (30) days after service of the notice; and
(d) If the department does not receive a written acceptance of the conditions
specified in a notice issued under paragraph (a) of this subsection to a
Page 63 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
licensee, agent, or both within thirty (30) days after service of the notice, the
commissioner shall serve an administrative complaint on the licensee,
agent, or both, as applicable, seeking to take an appropriate adverse action
under subsection (1)(a)4. of this section relating to the license or approval.
(5) Any person or person in control whose license, or agent or person in control of
an agent whose approval as an agent, has been:
(a) Denied shall not be eligible to apply for a license, to serve as an agent, or to
serve as a person in control of a licensee or agent for one (1) year after the
date of denial; or
(b) Revoked shall not be eligible to apply for a license, to serve as an agent, or
to serve as a person in control of a licensee or agent:
1. For the first revocation, until three (3) years after the date of
revocation; and
2. For any subsequent revocation, permanently.
(6) The surrender or expiration of a license, or an agent designation, shall not affect
a proceeding to suspend or revoke the license or approval of the agent.
SECTION 26. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Emergency order" means an order that does one (1) or more the following
without prior notice and hearing:
1. Suspends or conditions:
a. Any license; or
b. An approval to engage in virtual currency kiosk business at a
location, or through an agent, in this state; or
2. Directs any peace officer to:
a. Seize or impound a virtual currency kiosk, including any
Page 64 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
contents thereof; or
b. Render a virtual currency kiosk inoperable; and
(b) "Person" means any licensee, virtual currency kiosk operator, agent, or
other person.
(2) Subject to Section 24 of this Act, the commissioner may issue an emergency order
against any person, pending further investigation, the entry of a final order, or
other final legal action, if the commissioner has reason to believe or determines
one (1) or more of the following:
(a) The person is acting in violation of Section 4 of this Act;
(b) The licensee is not in compliance with Section 9 of this Act;
(c) The person has committed a material violation of this subtitle that poses an
immediate and irreparable harm to the public health, safety, or welfare;
(d) Subject to KRS 335B.020, the licensee or agent has been convicted of, pled
guilty to, or pled nolo contendere, or the licensee is knowingly employing or
contracting with a responsible individual that has been convicted of, pled
guilty to, or pled nolo contendere, to a:
1. Felony involving theft, fraud, or breach of trust; or
2. A crime under the USA PATRIOT Act of 2001, Pub. L. No. 107-56;
(e) The licensee has had any license, registration, claim of exemption, or other
authorization to do business relating to money transmission or virtual
currency kiosk business denied, revoked, suspended, or terminated by any
state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction;
(f) The licensee, agent, the licensee's responsible individual, or any key
shareholder, executive officer, director, or other person in control of the
licensee or agent is listed or becomes listed on the specially designated
nationals and blocked persons list prepared by the United States
Department of the Treasury or United States Department of State under
Page 65 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
Presidential Executive Order No. 13224 as a potential threat to commit
terrorist acts or to finance terrorist acts; or
(g) The licensee or agent is insolvent or otherwise satisfies one (1) of the
grounds listed in subsection (2)(b) of Section 25 of this Act.
(3) An emergency order issued under this section shall:
(a) Pursuant to KRS 13B.125, become effective when served by the
commissioner; and
(b) Remain in effect until it is:
1. Stayed, withdrawn, suspended, or superseded by order of the
commissioner; or
2. Terminated by court order.
SECTION 27. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Subject to Section 24 of this Act, the commissioner may issue a cease and desist
order requiring an applicant, a licensee, a virtual currency kiosk operator, an
agent, or any other person to cease and desist from violating one (1) or more
identified provisions of the following, if the commissioner has reason to believe or
determines that the violations have occurred or will occur:
(a) This subtitle;
(b) An administrative regulation promulgated under this subtitle;
(c) An order issued under this subtitle; or
(d) An agreement entered with the commissioner relating to compliance with
this subtitle.
(2) A cease and desist order issued under this section shall remain in effect until it is:
(a) Stayed, withdrawn, suspended, or superseded by order of the commissioner;
or
(b) Terminated by court order.
Page 66 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
SECTION 28. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "person" means any applicant, licensee, virtual currency
kiosk operator, agent, or other person.
(2) Subject to Section 24 of this Act, the commissioner may do one (1) or more of the
following:
(a) Issue an order against any person to:
1. Refund any amount charged or collected in violation of this subtitle;
or
2. Pay any fee or civil penalty, or provide any other remedy, authorized
under this subtitle;
(b) Levy a civil penalty against any person that violates, or participates in the
violation of, any:
1. Provision of this subtitle;
2. Administrative regulation promulgated under this subtitle;
3. Order issued under this subtitle; or
4. Agreement with the commissioner relating to compliance with this
subtitle; and
(c) For any virtual currency kiosk operator or its agent that is subject to a civil
penalty under paragraph (b) of this subsection, issue an order directing any
peace officer to:
1. Seize or impound the operator's or agent's virtual currency kiosk,
including any contents thereof; or
2. Render the operator's or agent's virtual currency kiosk inoperable.
(3) The civil penalty levied under subsection (2)(b) of this section:
(a) Shall be not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five
thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation; and
Page 67 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
(b) May:
1. Be assessed for each day the violation is outstanding; and
2. Include an order for the person to pay the state's costs and expenses
for the examination, investigation, and prosecution of the matter,
including reasonable attorney's fees and court costs.
SECTION 29. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person that intentionally or knowingly makes a false statement,
misrepresentation, false certification, or false entry, or omits a material entry, in
a record filed or required to be maintained under this subtitle is guilty of a Class
D felony.
(2) A person that intentionally or knowingly engages in virtual currency kiosk
business in this state for which a license is required under this subtitle without
being licensed under this subtitle is guilty of a Class C felony.
Section 30. KRS 286.2-015 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in KRS 41.470 to 41.476 and 41.480, and
subsections[subsection] (3) and (4) of this section, all political subdivisions of the
Commonwealth shall be prohibited from enacting and enforcing ordinances,
resolutions, and regulations pertaining to the financial or lending activities of
persons or entities that:
(a) Are subject to:
1. The jurisdiction of the department; or
2. The provisions of this chapter;
(b) Are subject to the jurisdiction or regulatory supervision of the Board of
Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Office of the Comptroller of
the Currency, the National Credit Union Administration, the Farm Credit
Administration, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or the United
Page 68 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
States Department of Housing and Urban Development; or
(c) Originate, purchase, sell, assign, securitize, assist, facilitate, or service
property interests or obligations created by financial transactions or loans
made, executed, or originated by persons or entities referred to in paragraph
(a) or (b) of this subsection.
(2) The requirements of this section shall apply to all ordinances, resolutions, or
regulations pertaining to financial or lending activities, including any ordinances,
resolutions, or regulations that:
(a) Limit or disqualify persons or entities from doing business with a political
subdivision based upon financial or lending activities; or
(b) Impose additional reporting requirements or other obligations on persons or
entities referred to in subsection (1) of this section seeking to do business with
a political subdivision.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as preventing the enforcement of
ordinances, regulations, or resolutions of political subdivisions of the
Commonwealth pertaining to civil rights.
(4) (a) Political subdivisions of this Commonwealth may enact and enforce
ordinances, regulations, and resolutions pertaining to virtual currency
kiosk business that are not in direct conflict with state law.
(b) Ordinances, regulations, and resolutions of political subdivisions of the
Commonwealth that impose greater requirements or restrictions on virtual
currency kiosk business than the requirements or restrictions set forth in
Subtitle 13 of KRS Chapter 286 shall not be considered in direct conflict
with state law.
SECTION 31. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A violation of any provision of Subtitle 13 of KRS Chapter 286 by a person
Page 69 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
subject to regulation as a virtual currency kiosk operator or agent under that
subtitle shall be deemed an unfair, false, misleading, or deceptive act or practice
in the conduct of trade or commerce in violation of KRS 367.170.
(2) All of the remedies, powers, and duties provided to the Attorney General or any
other person under KRS 367.110 to 367.300, and the penalties provided in KRS
367.990, pertaining to acts and practices declared unlawful by KRS 367.170, shall
apply with equal force and effect to a violation of any provision of Subtitle 13 of
KRS Chapter 286 by a person subject to regulation as a virtual currency kiosk
operator or agent under that subtitle.
(3) (a) The remedies and penalties prescribed in this section shall be cumulative.
(b) This section shall not be construed to limit or restrict the powers, duties,
remedies, or penalties available to the Attorney General, the
Commonwealth, or any other person under any other statutory or common
law.
Section 32. KRS 431.073 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who has been:
(a) Convicted of a Class D felony violation of Section 29 of this Act or KRS
17.175, 186.990, 194A.505, 194B.505, 217.181, 217.207, 217.208, 218A.140,
218A.1415, 218A.1416, 218A.1417, 218A.1418, 218A.1423, 218A.1439,
218A.282, 218A.284, 218A.286, 218A.320, 218A.322, 218A.324, 218A.500,
244.165, 286.11-057, 304.47-025, 324.990, 365.241, 434.155, 434.675,
434.850, 434.872, 511.040, 512.020, 514.030, 514.040, 514.050, 514.060,
514.065, 514.070, 514.080, 514.090, 514.100, 514.110, 514.120, 514.140,
514.150, 514.160, 516.030, 516.060, 516.090, 516.108, 517.120, 518.040,
522.040, 524.100, 525.113, 526.020, 526.030, 528.020, 528.040, 528.050,
530.010, or 530.050;
(b) Convicted of a series of Class D felony violations of one (1) or more statutes
Page 70 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
enumerated in paragraph (a) of this subsection arising from a single incident;
(c) Granted a full pardon; or
(d) Convicted of a Class D felony, or an offense prior to January 1, 1975 which
was punishable by not more than five (5) years' incarceration, which was not a
violation of KRS 189A.010, 508.032, or 519.055, abuse of public office, a sex
offense, or an offense committed against a child, and did not result in serious
bodily injury or death; or of multiple felony offenses eligible under this
paragraph;
may file with the court in which he or she was convicted an application to have the
judgment vacated. The application shall be filed as a motion in the original criminal
case. The person shall be informed of the right at the time of adjudication.
(2) (a) A verified application to have the judgment vacated under this section shall be
filed no sooner than five (5) years after the completion of the person's
sentence, or five (5) years after the successful completion of the person's
probation or parole, whichever occurs later.
(b) Upon the payment of the filing fee and the filing of the application, the Circuit
Court clerk shall serve a notice of filing upon the office of the
Commonwealth's attorney or county attorney that prosecuted the case and the
county attorney of the county where the judgment was entered. The office of
the Commonwealth's attorney or county attorney that prosecuted the case
shall file a response within sixty (60) days after being served with the notice
of filing. That time period may be extended for good cause, but the hearing on
the application to vacate the judgment shall occur no later than one hundred
twenty (120) days following the filing of the application. The inability to
determine the location of the crime victim shall constitute good cause for an
extension of time. No hearing upon the merits of the application shall be
scheduled until the Commonwealth's response has been filed, or if no
Page 71 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
response is received, no later than one hundred twenty (120) days after the
filing of the application.
(c) In any case in which the Commonwealth objects that the application is grossly
incomplete, the court shall order the person or agency originating the
application to supplement the application.
(3) Upon the filing of the Commonwealth's response to an application, or if no
response is received, no later than one hundred twenty (120) days after the filing of
the application, the court shall set a date for a hearing and the Circuit Court clerk
shall notify the office of the Commonwealth's attorney or county attorney that
prosecuted the case. The office of the Commonwealth's attorney or county attorney
that prosecuted the case shall notify the victim of the crime, if there was an
identified victim. The Commonwealth's attorney or county attorney shall be
authorized to obtain without payment of any fee information from the
Transportation Cabinet regarding the crime victim's address on file regarding any
vehicle operator's license issued to that person.
(4) (a) In an application pursuant to subsection (1)(d) of this section, upon the filing
of the Commonwealth's response objecting to the vacating of a judgment and
expungement of a record, the court shall schedule a hearing within one
hundred twenty (120) days of the Commonwealth's response. The prosecutor
shall specify in the objection the reasons for believing a denial of the
application is justified. At the hearing at which the applicant or his or her
attorney must be present, the applicant must prove by clear and convincing
evidence that:
1. Vacating the judgment and expunging the record is consistent with the
welfare and safety of the public;
2. The action is supported by his or her behavior since the conviction or
convictions, as evidenced that he or she has been active in rehabilitative
Page 72 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
activities in prison and is living a law-abiding life since release;
3. The vacation and expungement is warranted by the interests of justice;
and
4. Any other matter deemed appropriate or necessary by the court to make
a determination regarding the petition for expungement is met.
(b) At the hearing, the applicant may testify as to the specific adverse
consequences he or she may be subject to if the application is denied. The
court may hear testimony of witnesses and any other matter the court deems
proper and relevant to its determination regarding the application. The
Commonwealth may present proof of any extraordinary circumstances that
exist to deny the application. A victim of any offense listed in the application
shall have an opportunity to be heard at any hearing held under this section.
(c) If the court determines that circumstances warrant vacation and expungement
and that the harm otherwise resulting to the applicant clearly outweighs the
public interest in the criminal history record information being publicly
available, then the original conviction or convictions shall be vacated and the
records shall be expunged. The order of expungement shall not preclude a
prosecutor's office from retaining a nonpublic record for law enforcement
purposes only.
(5) The court may order the judgment vacated, and if the judgment is vacated the court
shall dismiss with prejudice any charges which are eligible for expungement under
subsection (1) of this section or KRS 431.076 or 431.078, and, upon full payment of
the fee in subsection (11) of this section, order expunged all records in the custody
of the court and any records in the custody of any other agency or official, including
law enforcement records, if the court finds that:
(a) The person had not in the five (5) years prior to the filing of the application to
have the judgment vacated been convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor;
Page 73 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
(b) No proceeding concerning a felony or misdemeanor is pending or being
instituted against the person; and
(c) For an application pursuant to subsection (1)(d) of this section, the person has
been rehabilitated and poses no significant threat of recidivism.
(6) If the court has received a response from the office of the Commonwealth's attorney
or county attorney that prosecuted the case stating no objection to the application to
have the judgment vacated, or if one hundred twenty (120) days have elapsed since
the filing of the application and no response has been received from the victim or
the office of the Commonwealth's attorney or county attorney that prosecuted the
case, the court may, without a hearing, vacate the judgment in the manner
established in subsection (5) of this section.
(7) Upon entry of an order vacating and expunging a conviction, the original conviction
shall be vacated and, upon full payment of the fee in subsection (11) of this section,
the record shall be expunged. The court and other agencies shall cause records to be
deleted or removed from their computer systems so that the matter shall not appear
on official state-performed background checks. The court and other agencies shall
reply to any inquiry that no record exists on the matter. The person whose record is
expunged shall not have to disclose the fact of the record or any matter relating
thereto on an application for employment, credit, or other type of application. If the
person is not prohibited from voting for any other reason, the person's ability to
vote shall be restored and the person may register to vote.
(8) An order vacating a conviction under this section shall not extend or revive an
expired statute of limitations, shall not constitute a finding of legal error regarding
the proceedings leading to or resulting in the conviction, shall not nullify any
findings of fact or conclusions of law made by the trial court or any appellate court
regarding the conviction, and shall not constitute a finding of innocence regarding
the conviction.
Page 74 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
(9) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall establish a form application to be
used in filing an application to have judgment vacated and records expunged.
(10) The filing fee for an application to have judgment vacated and records expunged
shall be fifty dollars ($50), which shall be deposited into a trust and agency account
for deputy clerks and shall not be refundable.
(11) (a) Upon the issuance of an order vacating and expunging a conviction pursuant
to this section, the applicant shall be charged an expungement fee of two
hundred fifty dollars ($250), which may be payable by an installment plan in
accordance with KRS 534.020.
(b) When the order is issued, the court shall set a date, no sooner than eighteen
(18) months after the date of the order, by which the defendant must comply
with the installment payment plan. The applicant shall be given notice of the
total amount due, the payment frequency, and the date by which all payments
must be made. The notice shall state that the expungement cannot be
completed until full payment is received, and that if the applicant has not
completed the installment payment plan by the scheduled date, he or she shall
appear on that date to show good cause as to why he or she is unable to satisfy
the obligations. Notwithstanding provisions of KRS 534.020 to the contrary,
no applicant shall be ordered to jail for failure to complete an installment plan
ordered pursuant to this section.
(c) The revenues and interest from the expungement fee shall be deposited in the
expungement fund created in KRS 431.0795.
(12) This section shall be retroactive.
SECTION 33. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 369.130 TO 369.139 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "hardware wallet provider" or "provider" means a
person that offers or provides a hardware wallet.
Page 75 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
(2) A hardware wallet provider:
(a) Shall:
1. Provide live customer service via a toll-free telephone number during
operating hours, which shall not be less than the hours between 8 a.m.
and 10 p.m. local time within the Commonwealth; and
2. Provide a mechanism for, and assist any person who owns a hardware
wallet that was provided by the provider with, resetting any password,
pin, seed phrase, or other similar information that is necessary to
access the contents of the hardware wallet; and
(b) May require any person requesting assistance under paragraph (a)2. of this
subsection to verify the person's identity prior to providing the assistance by
means other than providing the password, pin, seed phrase, or other
information.
(3) (a) A violation of this section shall be deemed to be an unfair, false, misleading,
or deceptive act or practice in the conduct of trade or commerce in violation
of KRS 367.170.
(b) All of the remedies, powers, and duties provided to the Attorney General or
any other person under KRS 367.110 to 367.300, and the penalties provided
in KRS 367.990, pertaining to acts and practices declared unlawful by KRS
367.170, shall apply with equal force and effect to a violation of this section.
(4) (a) The remedies and penalties prescribed in this section shall be cumulative.
(b) This section shall not be construed to limit or restrict the powers, duties,
remedies, or penalties available to the Attorney General, the
Commonwealth, or any other person under any other statutory or common
law.
(5) The Attorney General may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A necessary to effectuate, or as an aid to the effectuation of,
Page 76 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 380/GA
the proper enforcement of this section.
Section 34. Sections 1 to 32 of this Act take effect April 30, 2027.
Section 35. On or before January 1, 2027, the commissioner of the Kentucky
Department of Financial Institutions shall promulgate any emergency and ordinary
administrative regulations required under Sections 1 to 30 of this Act.
Page 77 of 77
HB038010.100 - 1451 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:53 AM GA